src/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
!! Proper noun inflection for Northern Mansi
! ----------------------

!! So far no work on Northern Mansi proper nouns.
!! It will contain two parts: A general Russian name base
!! and Mansi-specific names.


LEXICON PROP !! The only lexicon is {{PROP}}, it goes to K via singular cases.
+N+Prop+Sg+Nom: K ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Loc:%>т K ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Lat:%>н K ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Abl:%>ыныл K ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Instr:%>ыл K ;
+N+Prop+Sg+Trans:%>ыг K ;


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
